District of Columbia statutes.
38-208

Truancy procedures; inter-agency coordination.

(a)

If a minor student accumulates 10 unexcused absences during a school year, the educational institution shall notify the Metropolitan Police Department within 2 business days after the 10th unexcused absence.

(b)

Within 2 business days of the 10th unexcused absence, the educational institution shall notify the Office of the State Superintendent of Education which shall provide the parent with the truancy prevention resource guide created pursuant to § 38-2602(b)(19); provided, that the parent has not received the truancy prevention resource guide before the 10th unexcused absence.

(c)

In addition to the requirements set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section:

(1)

(A)

The educational institution shall refer a minor student 5 years of age through 13 years of age to the Child and Family Services Agency pursuant to § 4-1321.02(a-1), no later than 2 business days after the accrual of 10 unexcused absences within a school year.

(B)

Beginning in the 2013-2014 school year, the educational institution shall refer a minor student 14 years of age through 17 years of age to the Court Social Services Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia and to the Office of the Attorney General Juvenile Section no later than 2 business days after the accrual of 15 unexcused absences within a school year.

(2)

Within 3 business days of the Office of the Attorney General, Juvenile Section receiving written notification pursuant to paragraph (1)(B) of this subsection, the Office of the Attorney General shall send the minor student’s parent a letter notifying the parent that he or she may be subject to prosecution for violation of the school attendance requirements under this subchapter.

Feb. 4, 1925, ch. 140, Art. II, § 7
as added Sept. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 20-17, § 101(b)(2), 60 DCR 9839
2001 Ed., § 38-253.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-17 added this section.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Truancy Referral Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-56, Jan. 30, 2016, 62 DCR 15600).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Truancy Referral Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-180, Oct. 22, 2015, 62 DCR 14004).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Truancy Referral Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-285, Jan. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 1193).